California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
(a) Whenever a complaint for damages for personal injuries is filed against a physician and surgeon, dentist, registered nurse, dispensing optician, optometrist, pharmacist, registered physical therapist, podiatrist, licensed psychologist, osteopathic physician and surgeon, chiropractor, clinical laboratory bioanalyst, clinical laboratory technologist, or veterinarian, duly licensed as such under the laws of this state, or a licensed hospital as the employer of any such person, in an action for error, omission, or negligence in the
 performance of professional services, or performance of professional services without consent, any such defendant may, within six months after service of summons, move the court for an order, upon notice to plaintiff and all defendants having appeared in the action, and hearing, requiring the plaintiff to file an undertaking in a sum not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) as security for the costs of defense as provided in subdivision (d), which may be awarded against the plaintiff. The motion shall be supported by affidavit showing that the claim against the defendant is frivolous. Any defendant having appeared in the action and within 30 days after receipt of notice may join with the moving party requesting an order under this section as to the additional defendant. The failure of any defendant to join with the moving party shall preclude that defendant from subsequently requesting an order under this section.

At the hearing upon the motion, the court shall
 order the plaintiff to file the undertaking if the defendant shows to the satisfaction of the court that: (i) the plaintiff would not suffer undue economic hardship in filing the undertaking and (ii) there is no reasonable possibility that the plaintiff has a cause of action against each named defendant with respect to whom the plaintiff would otherwise be required to file the undertaking.

A determination by the court that an undertaking either shall or shall not be filed or shall be filed as to one or more defendants and not as to others, shall not be deemed a determination of any one or more issues in the action or of the merits thereof. If the court, upon any such motion, makes a determination that an undertaking be filed by the plaintiff as to any one or more defendants, the action shall be dismissed as to that defendant or defendants, unless the undertaking required by the court shall have been filed within the reasonable time as may be fixed by the court.

(b) This section does not apply to a complaint in an action commenced in a small claims court.

(c) Whenever more than one defendant is named, the undertaking shall be increased to the extent of not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each additional defendant in whose favor the undertaking is ordered, not to exceed the total of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(d) In any action requiring an undertaking as provided in this section, upon the dismissal of the action or the award of judgment to the defendant, the court shall require the plaintiff to pay the defendant’s court costs. Any sureties shall be liable for those costs in an amount not to exceed the sum of five hundred dollars ($500) or the amount of the undertaking, whichever is lesser, for each defendant with respect to whom the sureties have executed an
 undertaking. If the plaintiff prevails in the action against any defendant with respect to whom an undertaking has been filed, the defendant shall pay the costs to plaintiff incurred in defending the motion for dismissal authorized by this section.

(e) Any defendant filing a motion under this section or joining with a moving party under this section is precluded from subsequently filing a motion for summary judgment.

(f) Any defendant filing a motion for summary judgment is precluded from subsequently filing a motion, or joining with a moving party, under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 226, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1029.8.

(a) Any unlicensed person who causes injury or damage to another person as a result of providing goods or performing services for which a license is required under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) or any initiative act referred to therein, Division 3 (commencing with Section 5000), or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 18600) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 19000) of Division 8, of the Business and Professions Code, or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 25210) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 25230) of Part 3 of
 Division 1 of Title 4 of the Corporations Code, shall be liable to the injured person for treble the amount of damages assessed in a civil action in any court having proper jurisdiction. The court may, in its discretion, award all costs and attorney’s fees to the injured person if that person prevails in the action.

(b) This section shall not be construed to confer an additional cause of action or to affect or limit any other remedy, including, but not limited to, a claim for exemplary damages.

(c) The additional damages provided for in subdivision (a) shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(d) For the purposes of this section, the term “unlicensed person” shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) Any person, partnership, corporation, or
 other entity providing goods or services under the good faith belief that they are properly licensed and acting within the proper scope of that licensure.

(2) Any person, partnership, corporation, or other entity whose license has expired for nonpayment of license renewal fees, but who is eligible to renew that license without the necessity of applying and qualifying for an original license.

(3) Any person, partnership, or corporation licensed under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700) or Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 2840) of the Business and Professions Code, who provides professional nursing services under an existing license, if the action arises from a claim that the licensee exceeded the scope of practice authorized by his or her license.

(e) This section shall not apply to any action for unfair
 trade practices brought against an unlicensed person under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code, by a person who holds a license that is required, or closely related to the license that is required, to engage in those activities performed by the unlicensed person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 575, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1030.

(a) When the plaintiff in an action or special proceeding resides out of the state, or is a foreign corporation, the defendant may at any time apply to the court by noticed motion for an order requiring the plaintiff to file an undertaking to secure an award of costs and attorney’s fees which may be awarded in the action or special proceeding. For the purposes of this section, “attorney’s fees” means reasonable attorney’s fees a party may be authorized to recover by a statute apart from this section or by contract.

(b) The motion shall be made on the grounds that the
 plaintiff resides out of the state or is a foreign corporation and that there is a reasonable possibility that the moving defendant will obtain judgment in the action or special proceeding. The motion shall be accompanied by an affidavit in support of the grounds for the motion and by a memorandum of points and authorities. The affidavit shall set forth the nature and amount of the costs and attorney’s fees the defendant has incurred and expects to incur by the conclusion of the action or special proceeding.

(c) If the court, after hearing, determines that the grounds for the motion have been established, the court shall order that the plaintiff file the undertaking in an amount specified in the court’s order as security for costs and attorney’s fees.

(d) The plaintiff shall file the undertaking not later than 30 days after service of the court’s order requiring it or within a
 greater time allowed by the court. If the plaintiff fails to file the undertaking within the time allowed, the plaintiff’s action or special proceeding shall be dismissed as to the defendant in whose favor the order requiring the undertaking was made.

(e) If the defendant’s motion for an order requiring an undertaking is filed not later than 30 days after service of summons on the defendant, further proceedings may be stayed in the discretion of the court upon application to the court by the defendant by noticed motion for the stay until 10 days after the motion for the undertaking is denied or, if granted, until 10 days after the required undertaking has been filed and the defendant has been served with a copy of the undertaking. The hearing on the application for the stay shall be held not later than 60 days after service of the summons. If the defendant files a motion for an order requiring an undertaking, which is granted but the defendant
 objects to the undertaking, the court may in its discretion stay the proceedings not longer than 10 days after a sufficient undertaking has been filed and the defendant has been served with a copy of the undertaking.

(f) The determinations of the court under this section have no effect on the determination of any issues on the merits of the action or special proceeding and may not be given in evidence nor referred to in the trial of the action or proceeding.

(g) An order granting or denying a motion for an undertaking under this section is not appealable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 189, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1031.

In actions for the recovery of wages for labor performed, where the amount of the demand, exclusive of interest, does not exceed three hundred dollars ($300), the court shall add, as part of the cost, in any judgment recovered by the plaintiff or cross-complainant, an attorney’s fee not exceeding 20 percent of the amount recovered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 377, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1032.

(a) As used in this section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1) “Complaint” includes a cross-complaint.

(2) “Defendant” includes a cross-defendant, a person against whom a complaint is filed, or a party who files an answer in intervention.

(3) “Plaintiff” includes a cross-complainant or a party who files a complaint in intervention.

(4) “Prevailing party” includes the party with a net monetary recovery, a defendant in whose favor a dismissal is entered, a defendant where neither plaintiff nor defendant obtains any relief, and a defendant as against those plaintiffs who do not recover any relief against that defendant. If any party recovers other than monetary relief and in situations other than as specified, the “prevailing party” shall be as determined by the court, and under those circumstances, the court, in its discretion, may allow costs or not and, if allowed, may apportion costs between the parties on the same or adverse sides pursuant to rules adopted under Section 1034.

(b) Except as otherwise expressly provided by statute, a prevailing party is
 entitled as a matter of right to recover costs in any action or proceeding.

(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit parties from stipulating to alternative procedures for awarding costs in the litigation pursuant to rules adopted under Section 1034.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 131, Sec. 2.   (AB 1693)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1033.

(a) Costs or any portion of claimed costs shall be as determined by the court in its discretion in a case other than a limited civil case in accordance with Section 1034 where the prevailing party recovers a judgment that could have been rendered in a limited civil case.

(b) When a prevailing plaintiff in a limited civil case recovers less than the amount prescribed by law as the maximum limitation upon the jurisdiction of the small claims court, the following shall
 apply:

(1) When the party could have brought the action in the small claims division but did not do so, the court may, in its discretion, allow or deny costs to the prevailing party, or may allow costs in part in any amount as it deems proper.

(2) When the party could not have brought the action in the small claims court, costs and necessary disbursements shall be limited to the actual cost of the filing fee, the actual cost of service of process, and, when otherwise specifically allowed by law, reasonable attorneys’ fees. However, those costs shall only be awarded to the plaintiff if the court is satisfied that prior to the commencement of the action, the plaintiff informed the defendant in writing of the intended legal action against the defendant and that legal action could result in a judgment against the defendant that would include the costs and necessary disbursements
 allowed by this paragraph.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 107.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1033.5.

(a) The following items are allowable as costs under Section 1032:

(1) Filing, motion, and jury fees.

(2) Juror food and lodging while they are kept together during trial and after the jury retires for deliberation.

(3) (A) Taking, video recording, and transcribing necessary depositions, including an original and one copy of those taken by the claimant and one copy of depositions taken by the party against whom costs are allowed.

(B) Fees of a certified or registered interpreter for the deposition of a party or witness who does not proficiently speak or understand the English language.

(C) Travel expenses to attend depositions.

(4) Service of process by a public officer, registered process server, or other means, as follows:

(A) When service is by a public officer, the recoverable cost is the fee authorized by law at the time of service.

(B) If service is by a
 process server registered pursuant to Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 22350) of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code, the recoverable cost is the amount actually incurred in effecting service, including, but not limited to, a stakeout or other means employed in locating the person to be served, unless those charges are successfully challenged by a party to the action.

(C) When service is by publication, the recoverable cost is the sum actually incurred in effecting service.

(D) When service is by a means other than that set forth in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C), the recoverable cost is the lesser of the sum actually incurred, or the amount allowed to a public officer in this state for that service, except that the court may allow the sum actually incurred in effecting service upon application pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (c).

(5) Expenses of attachment including keeper’s fees.

(6) Premiums on necessary surety bonds.

(7) Ordinary witness fees pursuant to Section 68093 of the Government Code.

(8) Fees of expert witnesses ordered by the court.

(9) Transcripts of court proceedings ordered by the court.

(10) Attorney’s fees, when authorized by any of the following:

(A) Contract.

(B) Statute.

(C) Law.

(11) Court reporter fees as established by statute.

(12) Court interpreter fees for a qualified court interpreter authorized by the court for an indigent person represented by a qualified legal services project, as defined in Section 6213 of the Business and Professions Code, or a pro bono attorney, as defined in Section 8030.4 of the Business and Professions Code.

(13) Models, the enlargements of exhibits and photocopies of exhibits, and the electronic presentation of exhibits, including costs of rental equipment and electronic formatting, may be allowed if they were reasonably helpful to aid the trier of fact.

(14) Fees for the electronic filing or service of documents through an electronic filing service provider if a court requires or orders electronic filing or service of documents.

(15) Fees for the hosting of electronic documents if a court requires or orders a party to have documents hosted by an electronic filing service provider. This paragraph shall become inoperative on January 1, 2022.

(16) Any other item that is required to be awarded to the prevailing party pursuant to statute as an incident to prevailing in the action at trial or on appeal.

(b) The following items are not allowable as costs, except when expressly authorized by law:

(1) Fees of experts not ordered by the court.

(2) Investigation expenses in preparing the case for trial.

(3) Postage, telephone, and photocopying charges, except for
 exhibits.

(4) Costs in investigation of jurors or in preparation for voir dire.

(5) Transcripts of court proceedings not ordered by the court.

(c) An award of costs shall be subject to the following:

(1) Costs are allowable if incurred, whether or not paid.

(2) Allowable costs shall be reasonably necessary to the conduct of the litigation rather than merely convenient or beneficial to its preparation.

(3) Allowable costs shall be reasonable in amount.

(4) Items not mentioned in this section and items assessed upon application may be allowed or denied in the
 court’s discretion.

(5) (A) If a statute of this state refers to the award of “costs and attorney’s fees,” attorney’s fees are an item and component of the costs to be awarded and are allowable as costs pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (10) of subdivision (a). A claim not based upon the court’s established schedule of attorney’s fees for actions on a contract shall bear the burden of proof. Attorney’s fees allowable as costs pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) may be fixed as follows: (i) upon a noticed motion, (ii) at the time a statement of decision is rendered, (iii) upon application supported by affidavit made concurrently with a claim for other costs, or (iv) upon entry of default judgment. Attorney’s fees allowable as costs pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (C) of paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) shall be fixed either upon a noticed motion or upon entry of a default judgment,
 unless otherwise provided by stipulation of the parties.

(B) Attorney’s fees awarded pursuant to Section 1717 of the Civil Code are allowable costs under Section 1032 as authorized by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (10) of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 583, Sec. 1.   (AB 828)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1034.

(a) Prejudgment costs allowable under this chapter shall be claimed and contested in accordance with rules adopted by the Judicial Council.

(b) The Judicial Council shall establish by rule allowable costs on appeal and the procedure for claiming those costs.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 377, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

1034.5.

In unlawful detainer proceedings, the plaintiff who recovers judgment for possession of premises, and who advances or pays to the sheriff or marshal the expenses required for the eviction of any persons in possession or occupancy of the premises and the personal property of such persons, shall, after being advised by the sheriff or marshal of the exact amount necessarily used and expended to effect the eviction, be allowed to file a request for the same pursuant to rules adopted by the Judicial Council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 377, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

1036.

In any inverse condemnation proceeding, the court rendering judgment for the plaintiff by awarding compensation, or the attorney representing the public entity who effects a settlement of that proceeding, shall determine and award or allow to the plaintiff, as a part of that judgment or settlement, a sum that will, in the opinion of the court, reimburse the plaintiff’s reasonable costs, disbursements, and expenses, including reasonable attorney, appraisal, and engineering fees, actually incurred because of that proceeding in the trial court or in any appellate
 proceeding in which the plaintiff prevails on any issue in that proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 181, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1038.

(a) In any civil proceeding under the Government Claims Act (Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code) or for express or implied indemnity or for contribution in any civil action, the court, upon motion of the defendant or cross-defendant, shall, at the time of the granting of any summary judgment, motion for directed verdict, motion for judgment under Section 631.8, or any nonsuit
 dismissing the moving party other than the plaintiff, petitioner, cross-complainant, or intervenor, or at a later time set forth by rule of the Judicial Council adopted under Section 1034, determine whether or not the plaintiff, petitioner, cross-complainant, or intervenor brought the proceeding with reasonable cause and in the good faith belief that there was a justifiable controversy under the facts and law which warranted the filing of the complaint, petition, cross-complaint, or complaint or answer in intervention. If the court should determine that the proceeding was not brought in good faith and with reasonable cause, an additional issue shall be decided as to the defense costs reasonably and necessarily incurred by the party or parties opposing the proceeding, and the court shall render judgment in favor of that party in the amount of all reasonable and necessary defense costs, in addition to those costs normally awarded to the prevailing party. An award of defense costs under this section shall not
 be made except on notice contained in a party’s papers and an opportunity to be heard.

(b) “Defense costs,” as used in this section, shall include reasonable attorney’s fees, expert witness fees, the expense of services of experts, advisers, and consultants in defense of the proceeding, and where reasonably and necessarily incurred in defending the proceeding.

(c) This section shall be applicable only on motion made before the discharge of the jury or entry of judgment, and any party requesting the relief pursuant to this section waives any right to seek damages for malicious prosecution. Failure to make the motion shall not be deemed a waiver of the right to pursue a malicious prosecution action.

(d) This section shall only apply if the defendant or cross-defendant has made a motion for summary judgment, judgment
 under Section 631.8, directed verdict, or nonsuit and the motion is granted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 131, Sec. 3.   (AB 1693)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. General Provisions [1045. - 1055.]

1045.

If an original pleading or paper be lost, the Court may authorize a copy thereof to be filed and used instead of the original.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1046.

An affidavit, notice, or other paper, without the title of the action or proceeding in which it is made, or with a defective title, is as valid and effectual for any purpose as if duly entitled, if it intelligibly refers to the action or proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 71.)
-------------------------------------------

1046a.

In all cases brought under the provisions of any act providing for the establishment and quieting of title to real property in cases where the public records in the office of the county recorder have been, or shall hereafter be, lost or destroyed, in whole or in any material part by flood, fire or earthquake, all papers filed under order of court nunc pro tunc as of the date when they should have been filed, shall have the same force and effect as if filed on the date when they should have been filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1909, Ch. 686.)
-------------------------------------------

1047.

Successive actions may be maintained upon the same contract or transaction, whenever, after the former action, a new cause of action arises therefrom.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1048.

(a) When actions involving a common question of law or fact are pending before the court, it may order a joint hearing or trial of any or all the matters in issue in the actions; it may order all the actions consolidated and it may make such orders concerning proceedings therein as may tend to avoid unnecessary costs or delay.

(b) The court, in furtherance of convenience or to avoid prejudice, or when separate trials will be conducive to expedition and economy, may order a separate trial of any cause of action, including a cause of action asserted in a cross-complaint, or of any separate
 issue or of any number of causes of action or issues, preserving the right of trial by jury required by the Constitution or a statute of this state or of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 244.)
-------------------------------------------

1049.

An action is deemed to be pending from the time of its commencement until its final determination upon appeal, or until the time for appeal has passed, unless the judgment is sooner satisfied.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1050.

An action may be brought by one person against another for the purpose of determining an adverse claim, which the latter makes against the former for money or property upon an alleged obligation; and also against two or more persons, for the purpose of compelling one to satisfy a debt due to the other, for which plaintiff is bound as a surety.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1053.

When there are three referees all must meet, but two of them may do any act which might be done by all.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------

1054.

(a) When an act to be done, as provided in this code, relates to the pleadings in the action, or the preparation of bills of exceptions, or of amendments thereto, or to the service of notices other than of appeal and of intention to move for a new trial, the time allowed therefor, unless otherwise expressly provided, may be extended, upon good cause shown, by the judge of the court in which the action is pending, or by the judge who presided at the trial of the action; but the extension so allowed shall not exceed 30 days, without the consent of the adverse party.

(b) In all cases in which the court or judge is authorized by this section to grant an extension of time, the extension of time shall be granted when all attorneys of record of parties who have appeared in the action agree in writing to the extension of time, and any extension of time previously granted by stipulation of all attorneys of record of parties who have appeared in the action shall not be included in the computation of the 30-day limitation upon extensions of time allowed by the court or judge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 168.)
-------------------------------------------

1054.1.

(a) When an act to be done in any action or proceeding in any court of this state or before any state administrative agency, as provided by law or rule, relates to the pleadings in the action, or the preparation of bills of exceptions, or of amendments thereto, or to the service of notices (other than of appeal, of intention to move for a new trial, and of intention to move to vacate a judgment), and such act is not a motion for a judgment notwithstanding the verdict, the time allowed therefor, unless otherwise expressly provided, shall be extended to a date certain by the judges of the court or by the agency in which the action
 or proceeding is pending, or by the judge who presided at the trial of the action, when it appears to the judge of any court or to the agency to whom the application is made that an attorney of record for the party applying for the extension is a Member of the Legislature of this state, and that the Legislature is in session or in recess not exceeding a recess of 40 days or that a legislative committee of which the attorney is a duly appointed member is meeting or is to meet within a period which the court or agency finds does not exceed the time reasonably necessary to enable the member to reach the committee meeting by the ordinary mode of travel. When the Legislature is in session or in recess, extension shall be to a date not less than 30 days next following the final adjournment of the Legislature or the commencement of a recess of more than 40 days. If a date is available during recess, extension shall be to such earlier date. When a legislative committee is meeting or is to meet within a period which
 the court or agency finds does not exceed the time reasonably necessary to enable the member to reach the committee meeting by the ordinary mode of travel, extension shall be for such period as the court or agency finds will be reasonably necessary to enable the member to perform the act to be done in the action or proceeding, unless the extension would expire when the Legislature is to be in session; and in that case the extension shall be to a date not less than 30 days following the final adjournment of the Legislature or the commencement of a recess of more than 40 days. If the act may be reasonably done by the member within the recess, continuance shall be to such earlier date. However, any postponement granted under the provisions of this section shall suspend for the same period of time as the postponement, the running of any period of time for any ruling or proceeding by a court, board, commission, or officer, or for the performance by any party of any act affected by the postponement.

(b) Extension of time pursuant to this section is mandatory unless the court determines that the extension would defeat or abridge a right to relief pendente lite in a paternity action or a right to invoke a provisional remedy such as pendente lite support in a domestic relations controversy, attachment and sale of perishable goods, receivership of a failing business, and temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction, and that the continuance should not be granted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

1055.

If an action is brought against any officer or person for an act for the doing of which he had theretofore received any valid bond or convenant of indemnity, and he gives seasonable notice thereof in writing to the persons who executed such bond or covenant, and permits them to conduct the defense of such action, the judgment recovered therein is conclusive evidence against the persons so notified; and the court may, on motion of the defendant, upon notice of five days, and upon proof of such bond or covenant, and of such notice and permission, enter judgment against them for the amount so recovered and costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1907, Ch. 246.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Declaratory Relief [1060. - 1062.5.]

1060.

Any person interested under a written instrument, excluding a will or a trust, or under a contract, or who desires a declaration of his or her rights or duties with respect to another, or in respect to, in, over or upon property, or with respect to the location of the natural channel of a watercourse, may, in cases of actual controversy relating to the legal rights and duties of the respective parties, bring an original action or cross-complaint in the superior court for a declaration of his or her rights and duties in the premises, including a determination of
 any question of construction or validity arising under the instrument or contract. He or she may ask for a declaration of rights or duties, either alone or with other relief; and the court may make a binding declaration of these rights or duties, whether or not further relief is or could be claimed at the time. The declaration may be either affirmative or negative in form and effect, and the declaration shall have the force of a final judgment. The declaration may be had before there has been any breach of the obligation in respect to which said declaration is sought.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 73.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1060.5.

Any individual claiming to be a nonresident of the State of California for the purposes of the Personal Income Tax Law may commence an action in the Superior Court in the County of Sacramento, or in the County of Los Angeles, or in the City and County of San Francisco, against the Franchise Tax Board to determine the fact of his or her residence in this state under the conditions and circumstances set forth in Section 19381 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 952, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1061.

The court may refuse to exercise the power granted by this chapter in any case where its declaration or determination is not necessary or proper at the time under all the circumstances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1921, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

1062.

The remedies provided by this chapter are cumulative, and shall not be construed as restricting any remedy, provisional or otherwise, provided by law for the benefit of any party to such action, and no judgment under this chapter shall preclude any party from obtaining additional relief based upon the same facts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1921, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

1062.3.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), actions brought under the provisions of this chapter shall be set for trial at the earliest possible date and shall take precedence over all other cases, except older matters of the same character and matters to which special precedence may be given by law.

(b) Any action brought under the provisions of this chapter in which the plaintiff seeks any relief, in addition to a declaration of rights and duties, shall take such precedence only upon noticed motion and a showing that the action requires a speedy
 trial.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1062a by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676, Sec. 66.)
-------------------------------------------

1062.5.

Any insurer who issues policies of professional liability insurance to health care providers for professional negligence, as defined in Chapter 1 as amended by Chapter 2, Statutes of 1975, Second Extraordinary Session, any health care provider covered by such a policy, or any potentially aggrieved person, may bring an action in the superior court for a declaration of its, his, or her rights, duties, and obligations under Chapter 1 as amended by Chapter 2, Statutes of 1975, Second Extraordinary Session.

The court shall permit any of the following persons to intervene in the action:

(1) The Attorney General.

(2) Any other person whose appearance is determined by the court to be essential to a complete determination or settlement of any issues in the action.

The action shall be commenced in the superior court in the county in which the Attorney General is required to reside and keep his office pursuant to Section 1060 of the Government Code.

The action shall be set for trial at the earliest possible date and shall take precedence over all cases other than those in which the state is a party.

The court may make a binding declaration of the rights, duties, and obligations of the insurer, whether or not further relief is or could be claimed at the time. The declaration may be affirmative or negative in form and effect and shall have the force
 and effect of a final judgment.

If the declaration is appealed, the appeal shall be given precedence in the court of appeal and Supreme Court and placed on the calendar in the order of its date of issue immediately following cases in which the state is a party.

The remedy established by this section is cumulative, and shall not be construed as restricting any remedy established for the benefit of any party to the action by any other provision of law. No declaration under this section shall preclude any party from obtaining additional relief based upon the same facts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Actions to Enforce Real Property and Mobilehome Sales Agreements [1062.10. - 1062.10.]

1062.10.

No person or legal entity may maintain an action in any court in this state to enforce the terms of a real property sales contract as defined in Section 2985 of the Civil Code or a conditional sale contract on a mobilehome subject to local property taxation and subject to Division 13 (commencing with Section 18000) of Part 2 of the Health and Safety Code, providing for a change in ownership of real property or of a mobilehome subject to local property taxation until the agreement is duly recorded by the county recorder or the change-in-ownership statement required by Section 480 of the Revenue and Taxation Code is filed as
 provided in that section.

This section shall apply to the enforcement of those agreements which are alleged to have transferred ownership of real property or of a mobilehome subject to property taxation which are entered into after January 1, 1986.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 62, Sec. 1.   Effective April 23, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Computer Assistance [1062.20. - 1062.20.]

1062.20.

(a) In accordance with rules and policy of the Judicial Council, each court may establish and operate an interactive computer system to enable and assist a pro per litigant to prepare standardized pro per court documents for use in the following civil actions:

(1) Enforcement of court orders, including orders for visitation, child custody, and property division.

(2) Landlord and tenant actions.

(3) Uncontested dissolution of marriage.

(4) Probate of a will.

(b) The computer system may also provide standardized information to users, including, but not limited to, information regarding calculations for child and spousal support payments that meet the requirements described in Section 3830 of the Family Code, court procedures, rights and responsibilities of landlords and tenants, and alternative dispute resolution.

(c) The court may contract with a private entity to establish and operate the program and collect any fees described in subdivision (d).

(d) The court may establish and collect fees from the program not to exceed the reasonable costs to establish and operate the
 program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 507, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Foster Family Agency Accountability [1062.30. - 1062.34.]

1062.30.

This chapter applies to any claim or lawsuit against a foster family agency or a noncustodial adoption agency for the acts of their employees, contractors, or volunteers brought by a recipient of those services or on the recipient’s behalf.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 403, Sec. 1.   (AB 2496)   Effective September 22, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 1062.34.)
-------------------------------------------

1062.31.

It is the public policy of the State of California that foster family agencies or noncustodial adoption agencies, also known as FFAs, provide necessary services to vulnerable youth throughout the state and are integral to the foster care system. Consequently, FFAs are afforded the rights set forth in this chapter.
